Hawaii, session 2026, GM1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the existing process
for transferring ownership of a salvaged motor vehicle to an
insurance company after a total loss insurance settlement can
involve unnecessary delays and paperwork burdens due to
notarization and manual signature requirements. These
inefficiencies can hinder timely processing; increase
administrative costs; and burden vehicle owners, insurance
companies, and the counties.
The purpose of this Act is to modernize and streamline the
vehicle title transfer process by allowing for electronic
signatures to be used for salvaged vehicles after a total loss
insurance settlement.
SECTION 2. Section 286-48, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§286-48 Certificates of ownership of salvaged motor
vehicles. (a) Whenever a motor vehicle subject to registration
under this part is sold as salvage or conveyed to an insurance
2026-2413 SB2053 CDl SMA.docx 1

Page 2 S.B. NO. "'2
C.D. 1
company, in the ordinary course of business or as the result of
a total loss insurance settlement where the insurance company
receives the certificates of registration and ownership, the
purchaser or, if the purchaser is an insurance company2_ its
authorized agent, shallj^ within ten days from the purchase[—] or
the settlement of the insurance loss, forward the motor
vehicle's endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of
title, certificate of registration, license plates, and an
application for a salvage certificate as provided for in section
286-44.5 [-r] to the director of finance. If the certificate of
registration or one or both license plates are lost, an
affidavit, duly notarized and signed, or a declaration signed
electronically without a notary, by the party responsible for
the compliance of this section stating that the party has no
knowledge of the location of the certificate of registration or
the license plates, shall be filed with the director of finance
of the county having jurisdiction over the motor vehicle. In
any event the certificate of ownership or other evidence of
title shall be forwarded to the director of finance.
(b) Upon receipt of the certificate of ownership,
certificate of registration, license plates, and application for
2026-2413 SB2053 CDl SMA.docx
iiingiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiniiiH

Pages
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
a salvage certificate, the director of finance shall issue a
salvage certificate in the name of the purchaser or insurance
company.
(c) Upon resale of the salvage vehicle, the seller or, if
the seller is an insurance company, its authorized agent_^ shall
transfer the salvage certificate and issue a bill of sale to the
purchaser2_ which shall be on a form prescribed by the director
of finance. The seller shall notify the purchaser, in writing,
of the requirements of this chapter regarding the
recertification of salvage vehicles. The seller shall sell the
salvage vehicle only to a person licensed pursuant to chapter
437B, [eeefeiefte] section 289-4 [7-] or 445-232, or any person who
executes an affidavit [-whieh] that states whether [or not] the
salvage vehicle would be used to construct a rebuilt vehicle [a:&
dcf-incd in-scction 286-2] and that if the salvage vehicle is to
be rebuilt, the purchaser will register the rebuilt vehicle as
required by this chapter.
(d) In the event the salvage vehicle is rebuilt so as to
be capable of again operating on the highways of [-th4-&] the
State, the motor vehicle shall not be licensed for [-s^eh] the
operation, nor shall the ownership of the motor
2026-2413 SB2053 GDI SMA.docx
iHMiiiiinniiiiiiiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO. -'2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
vehicle be transferred until there is submitted to the director
of finance:
(1) The prescribed bill of sale;
(2) An appropriate application for registration of the
rebuilt vehicle or restored motor vehicle along with
the salvage certificate and a certificate of
inspection signed by the [jreg4&t-Grod or OGrtifiod]
licensed motor vehicle repair dealer who is bonded as
required by section 437B-26, and who rebuilt the
vehicle, attesting that the original recognized
vehicle manufacturer's established repair procedures
or specifications and allowable tolerances for the
particular model and year were utilized and adhered
to; and
(3) Any other document and fee required by the director of
finance.
The counties may, by ordinance, establish the fee to be charged
for the inspection of rebuilt [motor] vehicles.
(e) Whenever a certificate of registration and certificate
of ownership is issued for a motor vehicle with respect to which
a salvage certificate has been previously issued, the new
2026-2413 SB2053 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiHHiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
certificates shall conform to the requirements of section 286-47
and:
(1) Bear the words "Rebuilt Vehicle"; and
(2) Appear in [-sueh] a manner as to distinguish them from
the certificate of registration and certificate of
ownership for motor vehicles other than rebuilt
vehicles or restored motor vehicles.
(f) In the event a total loss insurance settlement between
an insurance company and its insured or a claimant for property
damage caused by its insured results in the retention of the
salvage vehicle by the insured or claimant, as the case may be,
then in [ouch] that event, the insurance company or its
authorized agent shall notify, within ten days from the date of
settlement, the director of finance of [ouch] the retention by
its insured or claimant, as the case may be, and shall notify
its insured[7-] or claimant [ao the caoc may bo], in writing, of
the requirements of this chapter regarding the recertification
of salvage vehicles. The notification shall be on a form
prescribed by the director of finance.
(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
supporting documents used to transfer ownership of a motor
2026-2413 SB2053 CDl SMA.docx
iimiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 6 2053
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
vehicle to an insurance company after payment of damages from
the result of a total loss insurance settlement pursuant to this
section:
(1) Shall not require a notarized signature;
(2) May be signed electronically; and
(3) May be printed on hard copy.
For the purposes of this subsection, ’’supporting documents”
includes but is not limited to power of attorney, application
for duplicate title, and odometer disclosure forms.
(h) An insurance company shall indemnify and hold harmless
the director of finance for any claims resulting from issuing a
title pursuant to this section utilizing documents signed
electronically without a notary.”
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
2026-2413 SB2053 CDl SMA.docx 6
iiniiiHiiiiiiHiiiuiBgiiiiiiig

S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2053, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify- that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of t Senate
11-26

SB No. 2053, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives